Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) For purposes of this section:
(a) A household is severely rent burdened if the  household spends more than 50 percent
of the income of the household on gross rent for housing.
(b) A regulated affordable unit is a  residential unit subject to a regulatory agreement
that runs with the land and that requires affordability for an  established income level for a
defined period of time.
(c) A single-family unit  may be rented or owned by a household and includes single-family
homes, duplexes, townhomes, row homes and mobile homes.
(2)(a) The Housing and Community Services Department shall annually provide to the
governing body of each city in this state with a  population greater than 10,000 the most
current data available from the United States Census Bureau, or any other source the  de-
partment considers  at least as reliable, showing the percentage of renter households in the
city that are severely rent burdened.
(b) The Housing and Community Services Department,  in collaboration with the Depart-
ment of Land Conservation and Development, shall develop a survey  form on which the
governing body  of a city may provide specific information related to the affordability of
housing within the city, including, but not limited to:
(A) The actions relating to land use and other  related matters that the governing body
has taken to increase the affordability of housing and reduce rent burdens for severely  rent
burdened households; and
(B) The additional actions the governing body intends to  take to reduce rent burdens for
severely rent burdened households.
(c) If the Housing and  Community Services Department determines that at least 25 per-
cent of the renter households in a city are severely rent  burdened, the department shall
provide the governing body of the city  with the survey form developed pursuant to paragraph
(b) of this subsection.
(d) The governing body of the city shall return  the completed survey form to the Housing
and Community  Services Department and the Department of Land Conservation and Devel-
opment within 60 days of receipt.
(3)(a) In any year in which the governing body of a city is informed under this  section
that at  least 25 percent of the renter households in the city are severely rent burdened, the
Enrolled House Bill 4006 (HB 4006-B) Page 1
governing body shall hold at least one public meeting  to discuss the causes and consequences
of severe rent burdens within  the city, the barriers to reducing rent burdens and possible
solutions.
(b) The Housing and Community Services Department may adopt rules  governing the
conduct of the public meeting required under this subsection.
(4) No later than February 1 of each year, the governing body of each city in this  state
with a population greater than 10,000 shall submit to the Department of Land  Conservation
and Development a report  for the immediately preceding calendar year setting forth sepa-
rately for each of the following categories the total number of units that were  permitted and
the total number that were produced:
(a) Residential units.
(b) Regulated affordable residential units.
(c) Multifamily residential units.
(d) Regulated affordable multifamily residential units.
(e) Single-family units.
(f) Regulated affordable single-family units.
SECTION 2.
(1) Section 1 of this 2018  Act becomes operative on the 91st day after the
date on which the 2018 regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative  Assembly adjourns
sine die.
(2) Notwithstanding the operative date specified  in subsection (1) of this section, the
Housing and Community Services Department may, before the  operative date specified in
subsection (1) of  this section, adopt rules and take any action necessary for the department
and the governing bodies of cities to comply with section 1 of this 2018 Act on and after the
operative date specified in subsection (1) of this section.
SECTION 3.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated for the biennium ending June 30, 2019, out of the General Fund:
(1) To the Department of Land Conservation and Development, the  amount of $1,730,000
for the purpose  of providing technical assistance to local governments in increasing the
affordability of housing within the boundaries of the local governments. In providing techni-
cal assistance, the department shall give priority to cities described in section  1 (3) of this
2018 Act.
(2) To the Housing and Community Services Department, the amount  of $270,000 for the
purpose of conducting a study on the cost of affordable housing and providing technical as-
sistance grants to promote the development of subsidized affordable housing.
SECTION 4.
This 2018 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2018 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 4006 (HB 4006-B) Page 2
Passed by House March 1, 2018
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 2, 2018
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2018
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4006 (HB 4006-B) Page 3